Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.400

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and RCW 23.95.405 through 23.95.460 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Registered agent filing" means:

(a) The public organic record of a domestic entity;

(b) An application of a domestic limited liability partnership; or

(c) A registration statement filed pursuant to RCW 23.95.510.

(3) [(2)] "Represented entity" means:

(a) A domestic entity; or

(b) A registered foreign entity.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1401.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.